New Jersey, session 221, A2083.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The New Jersey Transit Corporation shall require, for all rail passenger vehicles that are owned or operated by the corporation, that any interior door that provides access to the operators cabin of the rail passenger vehicle, or to any compartment wherein controls to the rail passenger vehicle are located, be locked and secured at all times, except in cases of emergency or where the interests of health, safety, or security require otherwise. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.